West Virginia, session 2026, HB5058.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. HOTELS AND RESTAURANTS. §16-6-2. Regulations by state board of health; enforcement of orders and laws respecting pure food. The West Virginia board of health shall make such rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, as in their judgment are necessary to carry out the provisions of this article: Provided, That any such rules and regulations issued shall require that any product sold for consumption in a restaurant which contains or is composed of any "Analogue product",  "Cell-cultured product", and/or "Food product" as defined in §19-39-2 of this code shall be clearly and legibly labeled as such on all menus for the informed consent of consumers considering the purchase such items for consumption. The director of the state department of health shall enforce any orders made by the board of health and any laws of the state respecting pure food, so far as they relate to hotels and restaurants.